Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5307
Operator of public water system; license required.

No public water system shall be issued or otherwise hold a permit to operate a public water system, granted by the department, unless its operator possesses a license issued by the department.

Laws 1976, LB 821, § 7;

Laws 2001, LB 667, § 38;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1226.